New York, session 2025-2026, A9597.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 8-a of section 1 of chapter 787 of 2 the laws of 1934, relating to the collection and disposal of garbage and 3 other refuse substances, as added by chapter 478 of the laws of 1982, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 1. a. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other 6 general, special or local law, chapter, code or regulation to the 7 contrary, in the towns of Brookhaven and Islip in the county of Suffolk, 8 or in either of them, the governing board of a joint garbage, metal and 9 refuse disposal system shall, except as otherwise provided for the 10 Seaview/Ocean Bay Park garbage district under paragraph b of this subdi- 11 vision, consist of five garbage commissioners, who shall be elected from 12 the entire territory of such garbage district as hereinafter set forth 13 and shall be known as the board of garbage commissioners thereof. Such 14 garbage commissioners individually, and such board of garbage commis- 15 sioners as an entity, shall have all the functions and powers of a trus- 16 tee or the board of trustees, respectively, as otherwise set forth in 17 this chapter insofar as feasible and consistent with the provisions of 18 this section. 19 b. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph a of this subdivision, 20 on and after July 1, 2026, the governing board of the Seaview/Ocean Bay 21 Park garbage district shall consist of seven commissioners. Five of such 22 commissioners shall be elected in accordance with paragraph a of this 23 subdivision except that two of such elected commissioners shall be resi- 24 dents of the Seaview community, two of such elected commissioners shall 25 be residents of the Ocean Bay Park community, and one of such elected 26 commissioners shall be elected from the entire territory of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14189-01-5 A. 9597 2 1 Seaview/Ocean Bay Park garbage district. The remaining two of the seven 2 commissioners shall consist of the elected president of Seaview and the 3 elected president of Ocean Bay Park, who shall have all the functions 4 and powers as the five commissioners elected in accordance with para- 5 graph a of this subdivision. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.